Utah statutes.
58-31b-701.   Immunity from liability.

A person licensed, registered, or certified under this chapter:

(1)  who provides emergency care in accordance with Section 78B-4-501 is entitled to the immunity from civil liability provided under that section; and

(2)  is considered a health care provider under Chapter 13, Health Care Providers Immunity from Liability Act, and is entitled to the immunity from civil liability provided under that chapter.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

